Louisiana, session 2026, HB1127.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 51:933(B) is hereby amended and reenacted and R.S. 51:933(C) is
hereby enacted to read as follows:
§933. Cooperative endeavor agreement requirements
* * *
B. The requirements set contained in Subsection A of this Section shall not
apply to any existing economic development programs established by the Louisiana
Constitution, the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950, or by administrative rule, prior
to August 15, 2010.
C. A cooperative endeavor agreement with a nongovernmental entity shall
require the nongovernmental entity to expend at least thirty-five percent of monies
received pursuant to the agreement on the purchase of goods manufactured or
produced in this state. A nongovernmental entity shall maintain all records
necessary to establish the requirements of this Subsection and if requested, shall
submit these records to the department. The requirements of this Subsection shall
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2408 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1127
not apply to any economic development programs established by the Louisiana
Constitution, the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950, or by administrative rule prior
to August 1, 2026.